Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF819.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MINNESOTA SUSTAINABLE FORAGING TASK FORCE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of natural resources must establish the Minnesota Sustainable Foraging Task Force to develop scientifically sound, data-driven recommendations for foraging regulations on state lands that balance the need for ecological sustainability with the right of Minnesotans to enjoy the state's bountiful natural resources through foraging. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish the task force by September 1, 2025, which must include: new text end new text begin (1) two members of the senate committee with jurisdiction over natural resources policy, one appointed by the majority leader of the senate and one appointed by the minority leader of the senate; new text end new text begin (2) two members of the house of representatives committee with jurisdiction over natural resources policy, one appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives; and new text end new text begin (3) the following 13 members appointed by the commissioner of natural resources: new text end new text begin (i) two scientists with expertise in botany, ecology, and environmental science from Minnesota universities; new text end new text begin (ii) a representative of the Department of Natural Resources involved with managing state parks and other public lands; new text end new text begin (iii) two representatives of Indigenous communities with knowledge of traditional foraging practices; new text end new text begin (iv) two experts in food safety and public health; new text end new text begin (v) one representative from the Minnesota Mycological Society; new text end new text begin (vi) one representative from the Minnesota Foraging Alliance; new text end new text begin (vii) one representative from a foraging advocacy group that represents one or more underrepresented cultural groups; new text end new text begin (viii) one representative from a small business teaching sustainable foraging practices; new text end new text begin (ix) one representative from a conservation organization; and new text end new text begin (x) one representative of an academic institution that conducts research on local ecosystems, species recovery, and sustainable harvesting. new text end new text begin (b) A member appointed under paragraph (a) may not be a registered lobbyist. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The task force must: new text end new text begin (1) gather and review data on the impact of foraging on species resilience, ecosystem health, and other aspects of Minnesota's diverse biomes; new text end new text begin (2) review existing regulations governing foraging activities on state lands; new text end new text begin (3) develop recommendations for science-based, data-driven foraging guidelines for state lands that balance public access with conservation needs, setting limits on foraging activities only where supported by data. The recommendations must be in the form of draft statutory or rule language and must be consistent with Indigenous and other cultural practices and traditions; new text end new text begin (4) develop educational materials and recommendations for increasing public understanding of sustainable foraging practices that include safety and ecological considerations; new text end new text begin (5) solicit public input, when appropriate; and new text end new text begin (6) develop a permitting model that would include an option to pay for foraging permits through volunteerism instead of through payment of a monetary fee. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Administration. new text end new text begin At its initial meeting, the task force must adopt a process for rotating the chair at each meeting. The task force must meet at least monthly, and the Department of Natural Resources must serve as staff to the task force. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Legislative recommendations; expiration. new text end new text begin No later than December 1, 2026, the task force must submit a written report containing its findings and recommendations to the commissioner of natural resources and to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over natural resources policy. The recommendations in the report must be specific and actionable. The task force expires September 1, 2026, or upon submission of the report required by this subdivision, whichever occurs later. new text end